District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,

That this act may be cited as the “Nonprofit Solar Tax Exemption Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 1005 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new subsection to read as follows:
“(e) This section shall not apply to buildings or grounds used for solar energy generation,
energy storage, energy management activities that comply with Energy Star guidelines, or
electric vehicle charging.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective Date.


This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.